Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 19.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5734
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the Nebraska Clean Indoor Air Act. The department shall consult with interested persons and professional organizations before adopting such rules and regulations.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 19.